Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-550
Local hospital district board of directors; terms; nonpartisan ballot.

Two members of a local hospital district board of directors shall be elected at the first statewide primary election after the initial appointment of members pursuant to section 23-3534, and three members shall be elected at the second statewide primary election after such initial appointment. Members shall be elected from the hospital district at large for terms which begin on the first Tuesday in June following their election. Except as otherwise provided in this section, each member shall serve for a term of four years or until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The members shall be elected on the nonpartisan ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 146.